Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-133] Noncompliance with procedural
rules. Any person subject to this chapter who:

(1) Is responsible for unnecessary delay in the
disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this chapter;
or

(2) Knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or
comply with any provision of this chapter regulating the proceedings before,
during, or after trial of an accused;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next